California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) State-funded perinatal services shall be provided under the Medi-Cal program to pregnant persons and state-funded medical services to infants up to one year of age in families with incomes above 185 percent, but not more than 208 percent, of the federal poverty level, in the same manner that these services are being provided to the Medi-Cal population, including eligibility requirements and integration of eligibility determinations and payment of claims. When determining eligibility under this section, an applicant’s or beneficiary’s income shall be determined, counted, and valued in accordance with the methodology set forth in Section 14005.64.

(b) Services provided under this section shall not be subject to any spend down of excess income
 requirements.

(c) (1) The department, in implementing the Medi-Cal program and public health programs, may provide for outreach activities in order to enhance participation and access to perinatal services. Funding received pursuant to the federal provisions shall be used to expand perinatal outreach activities. These outreach activities shall be implemented if funding is provided for this purpose by an appropriation in the annual Budget Act or other statute.

(2) Those outreach activities authorized by paragraph (1) shall be targeted toward both Medi-Cal and non-Medi-Cal eligible high risk or uninsured pregnant persons and infants. Outreach activities may include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Education of the targeted persons on the availability and importance of early
 prenatal care and referral to Medi-Cal and other programs.

(B) Information provided through toll-free telephone numbers.

(C) Recruitment and retention of perinatal providers.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, contracts required to implement this section shall be exempt from the approval of the Director of General Services and from the Public Contract Code.

(e) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 153) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 109.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Inoperative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 108 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14148.6.

The department shall engage in outreach activities in order to enhance participation in and access to perinatal services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1446, Sec. 4.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

14148.7.

(a) The department shall implement the federal options authorized by federal law to assist in the delivery of timely and continuing prenatal care by establishing the option of presumptive eligibility under Section 1396r-1 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(b) The program shall be known, and may be cited, as “Presumptive Eligibility for Pregnant People (PE4PP).”

(c) For a pregnant person covered under PE4PP who applies for full-scope Medi-Cal
 benefits, if the application is submitted at any time from the date of their presumptive eligibility determination through the last day of the subsequent calendar month, the department shall ensure the pregnant person is covered under PE4PP until the pregnant person is either enrolled in full-scope Medi-Cal benefits or has received a written denial notice in response to their application for full-scope Medi-Cal benefits.

(d) The department shall require providers participating in the PE4PP program to provide information to pregnant persons enrolled in PE4PP on how to contact the person’s county to expedite the county’s determination of a Medi-Cal application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 372, Sec. 5.   (AB 1481)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14148.75.

At the earliest date that it is administratively feasible, the department shall adopt the federal medicaid option under Section 1902(l)(3) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(l)(3)) to waive the use of a resource standard for determining the eligibility of pregnant women, infants, and children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 624, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14148.8.

(a) (1) The State Department of Health Care Services shall provide Medi-Cal reimbursements to alternative birth centers for facility-related delivery costs at a statewide all-inclusive rate per delivery that shall not exceed 80 percent of the average Medi-Cal reimbursement received by general acute care hospitals with Medi-Cal contracts and shall be based on an average hospital length of stay of 1.7 days. The reimbursement rate shall be updated annually and shall be based on the California Medical Assistance Commission’s annually published legislative report of average contract rates for general acute care hospitals with Medi-Cal contracts. However, the reimbursement shall not exceed the alternative birth center’s charges to
 any non-Medi-Cal patient for similar services. This paragraph shall apply to Medi-Cal reimbursement for facility-related delivery costs of alternative birth centers until the effective date of any necessary federal approval obtained by the department pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) Effective no earlier than July 1, 2017, the department shall reimburse facility-related Medi-Cal delivery costs of eligible alternative birth centers based on a statewide all-inclusive rate per delivery that shall not exceed 80 percent of the average diagnosis-related groups (DRG) Level 1 rates received by general acute care hospitals pursuant to Section 14105.28 and the applicable provisions of the Medi-Cal State Plan. Reimbursement pursuant to this paragraph shall not exceed the alternative birth center’s charges to any non-Medi-Cal patient for similar services. The
 department shall seek any federal approvals necessary to implement this paragraph. This paragraph shall not be implemented until any necessary federal approvals are obtained. This paragraph shall not be construed to make inoperative any existing payment reductions that are applicable to alternative birth center services, including, but not limited to, the payment reductions imposed pursuant to Section 14105.192, subject to paragraph (3).

(3) Effective July 1, 2022, or the effective date specified in any necessary federal approvals obtained by the department to implement subparagraph (B) of paragraph (13) of subdivision (h) of Section 14105.192, whichever is later, reimbursement to alternative birth centers shall be exempt from the payment reductions imposed by subdivision (d) of Section 14105.192.

(b) In order to be eligible for reimbursement pursuant to this section, an alternative birth center shall satisfy the following criteria as determined by the state department:

(1) The facility shall meet all applicable requirements of Section 1204.3 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The facility may utilize licensed midwives, certified nurse-midwives, certified nurse practitioners, and clinical nurse specialists when appropriate.

(3) The facility shall meet the standards for certification established by the American Association of Birth Centers, or at least equivalent standards as determined by the department, including those relating to the proximity and involvement of hospitals, obstetricians, and
 pediatricians.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of provider bulletins or notices, policy letters, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(d) This section does not alter the scope of practice for any health care professional or authorize the delivery of health care services in a setting or in a manner not authorized by the Health and Safety Code or the Business and Professions Code.

(e) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation
 is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 595, Sec. 2.   (AB 55)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14148.85.

The department shall provide for the receipt and initial processing of Medi-Cal applications from pregnant people and from children born after September 30, 1983, who have not yet attained 19 years of age, at facilities other than the county welfare department as described in Title XIX of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 and following).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 372, Sec. 6.   (AB 1481)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.8. Perinatal Outreach, Coordination, and Expansion Services [14148.9. - 14148.98.]

14148.9.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that there is a strong statistical relationship between early entry into prenatal care and healthy birth outcomes. An investment in early intervention is highly cost-effective and prevents untold suffering.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the goals of the program established pursuant to this article, in combination with other programs for pregnant women and children, shall be as follows:

(1) To improve access to and quality of prenatal care by making existing programs serving poor women more accessible through outreach, coordination, and removal of barriers to care.

(2) To combine efforts with other programs to measurably reduce the number of women who smoke, use drugs, or engage in other unhealthy practices during pregnancy.

(c) In order to achieve these goals, it is the intent of the Legislature to improve and coordinate existing programs for pregnant women and infants and to remove barriers to care with an intense focus on women who are at high risk of delivering a low or high birth weight baby or a baby who will suffer from major health problems or disabilities.

(d) The program implemented pursuant to this article shall focus on those
 target populations that are comprised of pregnant high risk women or potentially pregnant teenagers, pregnant women, and women of childbearing age who are likely to become pregnant who smoke, consume alcoholic beverages, or use controlled substances, Black, Hispanic, Native American, and Asian-Pacific Island women who are pregnant or of childbearing age, and uninsured women of childbearing age.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 278) by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 706.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14148.91.

(a) No later than March 15 of each year, the department shall report to the appropriate committees of the Legislature and the Governor, on a statewide and county-by-county basis, the most recent data on all of the following:

(1) The number of live births to women receiving prenatal care in the first trimester, in the second trimester, and in the third trimester, as well as an analysis of barriers to care to the extent available.

(2) The number of maternal deaths by race and ethnic group.

(3) The number of live births by county, race, and ethnic group.

(4) The number of fetal deaths of infants over 20 weeks’ gestation by race and ethnic group.

(5) The number of infant deaths by county, race, and ethnic group from birth to 28 days postpartum.

(6) The number of infant deaths by county, race, and ethnic group from 29 days postpartum to one year.

(7) The number of live births under 2,500 grams and over 4,500 grams by race and ethnic group.

(8) The number of live births under 1,500 grams by race
 and ethnic group.

(9) The number of women eligible for prenatal, delivery, or postpartum care under Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code in the past year.

(10) The source of payment for prenatal care and delivery.

(b) No later than March 15 of each year, the department shall report to the appropriate committees of the Legislature and the Governor on a statewide basis, to the extent data are available, all of the following:

(1) The number of infants eligible for services under Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) The number of newborn babies screened or diagnosed with
 Fetal Alcohol Syndrome.

(3) The number of babies born with drug dependencies, HIV infection, and sexually transmitted diseases.

(4) Whether the mother smoked, consumed alcoholic beverages, or used controlled substances without a prescription, during pregnancy.

(c) (1) The department, in consultation with the Legislative Analyst, shall contract, using appropriate state administrative funds, with an appropriate entity for a one-time, statistical survey of the income of mothers, utilizing a statistically valid sample linked to the birth certificate.

(2) The State Department of Health Services shall not use more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of administrative funds for the survey required by paragraph (1).

(3) The income information required by paragraph (1) shall be categorized according to the following income categories:

(A) Persons whose family income does not exceed 150 percent of the official federal poverty line.

(B) Persons whose family income exceeds 150 percent of the official federal poverty line but does not exceed 185 percent of the official federal poverty line.

(C) Persons whose family income exceeds 185 percent of the official federal poverty line but does not exceed 200 percent of the official federal poverty line.

(D) Persons whose family income exceeds 200 percent of the official federal poverty line but does not exceed 225 percent of the official federal poverty line.

(E) Persons whose family income exceeds 225 percent of the official federal poverty line.

(F) Persons whose family income exceeds 250 percent of the official federal poverty line level but does not exceed 300 percent of the official federal poverty line.

(d) The department shall, in addition to the information required by subdivision (a), report on trends in private insurance coverage of maternity care, to the extent the data is available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 388.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14148.98.

No funds from the Health Education Account in the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund may be used in a manner that violates paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 30122 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1170, Sec. 13.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.9. Medi-Cal Managed Care Benefits for Nondisabled Persons with HIV [14149. - 14149.3.]

14149.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article, to expand eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits, with the exception of prescription drug benefits provided by the AIDS Drug Assistance Program (ADAP), to persons with HIV who are enrolled in ADAP and who are not disabled, but who, if disabled, would qualify for Medi-Cal benefits.

(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature that this expansion of the existing Medi-Cal program be funded by cost savings achieved
 through the voluntary enrollment into the existing Medi-Cal managed care program of persons who are disabled as a result of AIDS, and who are either receiving Medi-Cal benefits on a fee-for-service basis as of January 1, 2003, or who become eligible to receive Medi-Cal benefits on or after January 1, 2003.

(c) It is further the intent of the Legislature that the State Department of Health Services encourage the voluntary enrollment into the existing Medi-Cal managed care program of persons described in subdivision (b) in order to obtain sufficient cost savings to provide Medi-Cal benefits to the maximum feasible number of persons with HIV subject to the constraints of this article.

(d) It is further the intent of the Legislature that all protections of state and federal law and regulations that apply to the state’s Medi-Cal managed care program shall apply to those persons who
 become eligible for Medi-Cal pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 684, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14149.3.

(a) Subject to subdivisions (b) and (c), paragraph (2) of subdivision (f), and subdivision (k), the department shall, commencing July 1, 2003, or the date that all necessary federal waivers have been obtained, whichever is later, expand eligibility for benefits under this chapter, with the exception of those prescription drug benefits provided pursuant to ADAP, to any person with HIV who meets both of the following criteria:

(1) The person is enrolled in the ADAP program
 pursuant to Section 120960 of the Health and Safety Code, and maintains enrollment in that program.

(2) The person would otherwise qualify for Medi-Cal benefits if the person were disabled as defined in subdivision (h).

(b) Any person eligible for benefits pursuant to subdivision (a), and seeking enrollment in Medi-Cal pursuant to this article shall be enrolled on a first-come-first-served basis pursuant to an allocation mechanism that shall be developed by the department.

(c) Any person who is eligible for enrollment in Medi-Cal pursuant to this article shall be required to elect a Medi-Cal managed care plan in those counties in which a managed care plan is available, unless the department determines that the cost-neutrality requirements provided for in subdivision (f) and the enrollment goals provided for in this
 article can be achieved without this requirement.

(d) In implementing this article, the department shall ensure that all of the following standards are met:

(1) All state and federal laws and regulations that apply to the state’s Medi-Cal managed care program shall apply to the expansion provided by this article and to the beneficiaries eligible for Medi-Cal pursuant to this article.

(2) The Medi-Cal benefits provided under this article shall include prescription drugs not provided by the AIDS Drug Assistance Program.

(3) All participating plans that assume full risk for all health care services, including inpatient and outpatient services, shall be licensed pursuant to the Knox-Keene Act (Article 1 commencing with Section 1340) of Chapter 2.2 of
 Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code), except as provided in Section 1343 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) Health care service plans participating in the Medi-Cal managed care program shall comply with the applicable sections of the Knox-Knee Act (Article 1 (commencing with Section 1340) of Chapter 2.2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code), including Sections 1367 and 1374.16 of the Health and Safety Code and the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 1374.16 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) Primary care case management plans participating in the Medi-Cal managed care program shall comply with the applicable sections of Article 2.9 ( commencing Section 14088). Primary care case management plans are required to maintain grievance and appeal procedures consistent with the existing Medi-Cal managed care program, to address beneficiary grievances.

(e) The department shall establish capitation rates to be paid to Medi-Cal managed care plans for services provided pursuant to this section. These capitation rates may not exceed 95 percent of the fee-for-service equivalent costs to the Medi-Cal program for medical services for persons with HIV.

(f) (1) The department shall meet federal revenue neutrality requirements through the savings generated by the voluntary enrollment into Medi-Cal managed care of persons who are disabled as a result of AIDS, and who are either receiving Medi-Cal benefits on a fee-for-service basis as of January 1, 2003, or who become eligible to receive Medi-Cal benefits on or after January 1, 2003. The savings generated by increased voluntary enrollments in Medi-Cal managed care shall be used to fund enrollment by individuals eligible for the expansion of Medi-Cal eligibility provided
 for pursuant to subdivision (a). Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude the department from implementing other means of meeting the federal revenue neutrality requirements, provided that all requirements of this article are met.

(2) The department may not enroll individuals described in subdivision (a) until the department can ensure sufficient savings, pursuant to paragraph (1), equal to or greater than the cost of providing benefits to these individuals.

(g) The department shall encourage the voluntary enrollment into Medi-Cal managed care of persons who are disabled as a result of AIDS. The department shall conduct all outreach and awareness activities necessary to implement this requirement in a manner consistent with Section 14407 to ensure that persons who enroll in managed care do so voluntarily. These outreach and awareness activities shall include information on how
 electing managed care may alter provider relationships and how persons may revert to fee-for-service if they prefer to return to fee-for-service.

(h) For the purposes of this section, “disabled” means a person who meets the eligibility criteria for the federal Supplemental Security Income for the Aged, Blind and Disabled program (Subchapter 16 (commencing with Section 1381) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code).

(i) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this article, without taking any regulatory action, by means of an all-county letter or similar instruction. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(j) Commencing January 1, 2003, the department shall seek the appropriate federal waiver under Section 1115 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1315) to implement the expansion of eligibility provided for pursuant to this section. The department shall maximize the federal reimbursement received for services provided under this article to those eligible pursuant to this section.

(k) This article shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, the department determines that federal financial participation is available pursuant to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 684, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.10. Medi-Cal Dental Program [14149.8. - 14149.8.]

14149.8.

(a) The department shall expedite the enrollment of Medi-Cal dental providers by streamlining the Medi-Cal provider enrollment process. The department shall pursue and implement all of the following activities, to the extent permitted by federal law:

(1) Create a dental-specific enrollment form.

(2) Pursue an alternative automatic enrollment process for a provider already commercially credentialed by either a dental fee-for-service contractor or an administrative services contractor for the purpose of providing services as a commercial provider.

(3) Discontinue requiring providers to resubmit an enrollment application that has been deemed incomplete if the missing information is available elsewhere within the application packet.

(4) To the extent that the department expedites the enrollment of Medi-Cal dental providers by streamlining the Medi-Cal provider enrollment process, the department shall publish the criteria for those processes in applicable provider bulletins and manuals.

(b) (1) The department shall maintain the provider network on a monthly basis by deactivating a billing provider who has not, over a continuous 12-month period, submitted a claim for reimbursement for services rendered.

(2) Prior to deactivating a
 provider described in paragraph (1), the department shall send a notice to the provider informing the provider that the provider shall be deactivated from the dental program unless the provider requests reactivation within six months after the date of the notice. The department shall not disenroll a provider until six months after the date of that notice. This paragraph shall not be implemented until the date the department implements and programs the necessary system changes to the California Dental Medicaid Management Information Systems to implement this paragraph, or no sooner than July 1, 2017, whichever is later.

(3) In order to improve the quality of the dental provider network, the department also shall exercise additional measures as appropriate and permitted by law, including, but not limited to, temporary suspensions. The
 parameters and criteria developed by the department for additional measures for deactivations and disenrollments shall be published in applicable provider bulletins and manuals.

(c) (1) The department shall monitor access and utilization of Medi-Cal dental services in the fee-for-service and managed care delivery systems to assess opportunities to improve access and utilization, including an annual review of the treatment authorization review process.

(2) The department shall assess opportunities to develop and implement innovative payment reform proposals within the Medi-Cal dental programs.

(d) The department shall explore additional opportunities to improve the Medi-Cal Dental Program, in
 consultation with stakeholders and as deemed appropriate by the department and to the extent permitted by federal law, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Aligning the provision of dental anesthesia services with that of medical anesthesia services, including the ability to bill for applicable facility fees and ancillary services.

(2) Adjusting other utilization controls for specialty services, as appropriate, to promote access to care while still protecting program integrity.

(3) Expanding the scope of beneficiary outreach activities required by an entity that is contracted with the department to more broadly address underutilization throughout the state.

(e) Prior to implementing an action pursuant to subdivision (d), the department shall post the proposed action on its Internet Web site at least 30 days before implementation.

(f) The department shall work with dental managed care plans that contract with the department for the purposes of implementing the Medi-Cal Dental Program, which includes, but is not limited to, contracts authorized pursuant to Sections 14087.46, 14089, and 14104.3, to provide beneficiaries with access to dental plan liaisons to assist in the coordination of care for enrolled members.

(g) A Medi-Cal managed care health plan shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide dental screenings for every eligible beneficiary as a part of the
 beneficiary’s initial health assessment.

(2) Ensure that an eligible beneficiary is referred to an appropriate Medi-Cal dental provider.

(3) Identify plan liaisons available to dental managed care contractors and dental fee-for-service contractors to assist with referrals to health plan covered services.

(h) In accordance with Section 438.230(c)(3) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, effective for the rating period for contracts with dental managed care plans beginning on or after July 1, 2017, the department shall require that the dental managed care plans provide that the department, the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the federal Office of the Inspector General, the federal Comptroller
 General, and their designees may, at any time, inspect and audit any records or documents of the managed care entity, or its subcontractors, and may, at any time, inspect the premises, physical facilities, and equipment where Medicaid-related activities or work is conducted. The right to audit under this subdivision exists for 10 years from the final date of the contract period or from the date of completion of any audit, whichever is later.

(i) In accordance with Section 438.230(c)(3) of Title 42 of Code of Federal Regulations, effective for the rating period for contracts with dental managed care plans beginning on or after July 1, 2017, the department shall require that the dental managed care plan contractors retain, and require its subcontractors to retain, as applicable, all of the following information for a period of no less than
 10 years:

(1) Enrollee grievance and appeal records.

(2) Base data.

(3) Medical loss ratio reports.

(4) The data, information, and documentation specified in federal Medicaid regulations, including Sections 438.604, 438.606, 438.608, and 438.610 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(j) (1) To increase the efficiency and timeliness of changes, any contract amendment, modification, or change order to any contract entered into by the department for the purposes of implementing the state Medi-Cal Dental Program shall be exempt, except as provided in paragraph (2),
 from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, as well as Sections 11545 and 11546 of the Government Code, in addition to any policies, procedures, or regulations authorized by those provisions.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not exempt the department from establishing a competitive bid process for awarding new contracts pursuant to Section 14104.3, as well as for awarding new dental contracts pursuant to Sections 14087.46 and 14089.

(k) Prior to implementing any change pursuant to this section, the department shall consult with, and provide notification to, stakeholders, including representatives from counties, local dental societies, nonprofit entities, legal aid entities, and other interested parties.

(l) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific policies and procedures pertaining to the dental fee-for-service program and dental managed care plans, as well as applicable federal waivers and state plan amendments, including the provisions set forth in this section, by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until regulations are adopted.

(2) No later than December 31, 2018, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Beginning six months
 after the effective date of this section, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis until regulations have been adopted.

(m) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that all of the following occur:

(1) The department obtains any federal approvals necessary to implement this section.

(2) The department obtains federal matching funds to the extent permitted by federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 511, Sec. 28.   (AB 1688)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.11. Diabetes Prevention Program [14149.9. - 14149.9.]

14149.9.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department pursue policies and programs to assist Medi-Cal beneficiaries in preventing or delaying the onset of type 2 diabetes.

(b) (1) The department shall establish the Diabetes Prevention Program (DPP) within the Medi-Cal fee-for-service and managed care delivery systems.

(2) A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall make the DPP available to enrolled beneficiaries in accordance with this article.

(c) In implementing the DPP, the department shall require that Medi-Cal providers offering DPP services comply with guidelines issued by the federal Centers for Disease
 Control and Prevention (CDC) and obtain CDC recognition in connection with the National Diabetes Prevention Program.

(d) The DPP shall be an evidence-based, lifestyle change program designed to prevent or delay the onset of type 2 diabetes among individuals with prediabetes.

(e) The DPP shall be made available to Medi-Cal beneficiaries no sooner than July 1, 2018.

(f) A Medi-Cal provider may identify and recommend participation in the DPP to a beneficiary who meets the eligibility requirements of the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention Diabetes Prevention Recognition Program.

(g) In implementing the DPP, the department shall require Medi-Cal providers offering DPP services to use a CDC-approved lifestyle change curriculum that does all of the following:

(1) Emphasizes self-monitoring, self-efficacy, and problem solving.

(2) Provides for coach feedback.

(3) Includes participant materials to support program goals.

(4) Requires participant weigh-ins to track and achieve program goals.

(h) DPP services shall be provided by peer coaches, who promote realistic lifestyle changes, emphasize weight loss through healthy eating and physical activity, and implement the DPP curriculum. A trained peer coach may be
 a physician, a nonphysician practitioner, or an unlicensed person who has been trained to deliver the required curriculum content and possesses the skills, knowledge, and qualities specified in the National Diabetes Prevention Program guidelines.

(i) A beneficiary who participates in the DPP shall be allowed to participate in 22 peer coaching sessions over a period of at least one year. Thereafter, the department shall provide a participating beneficiary who achieves and maintains a required minimum weight loss of 5 percent from the first core session, in accordance with CDC standards, with less intensive, ongoing maintenance sessions to help the beneficiary continue healthy behaviors.

(j) (1) The department shall develop payment methodologies, or adjust existing methodologies, for reimbursing DPP services and activities in the Medi-Cal fee-for-service
 delivery system, not to exceed 80 percent of the federal Medicare Program reimbursement for comparable service, billing, and diagnosis codes under the federal Medicare Program.

(2) For purposes of reimbursement under the Medi-Cal fee-for-service delivery system, an unlicensed peer coach shall have an arrangement with an enrolled Medi-Cal provider for purposes of reimbursement for rendered DPP services.

(k) This article shall be implemented only to the extent that the department obtains federal financial participation to the extent permitted by federal law, and obtains any necessary federal approvals.

(l) For the purposes of implementing this article, the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts on a bid or negotiated basis, including contracts for the purpose of obtaining subject matter
 expertise or other technical assistance. A contract may be statewide or on a more limited geographic basis. A contract entered into or amended pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from all of the following:

(1) Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(2) Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of the Government Code.

(3) Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(4) Review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(m) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this article, policies and procedures pertaining to the DPP, and applicable waivers and state plan amendments, by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time regulations are adopted. Thereafter, the department, by July 1, 2020, shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Beginning six months after the effective date of this article, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis until regulations have been adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 34, Sec. 31.   (AB 1810)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.12. Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic, and Treatment (EPSDT) Services [14149.95. - 14149.95.]

14149.95.

(a) The department shall prepare written informational materials that effectively explain and clarify the scope and nature of early and periodic screening, diagnostic, and treatment (EPSDT) services that are available under the Medi-Cal program. The informational materials shall use clear and nontechnical language.

(b) (1) The informational materials shall include, but not be limited to, the information required in Section 441.56(a) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations or its successor.

(2) The informational materials shall include content designed for youth, for purposes of delivery of that content to the beneficiaries described in paragraph (2) of subdivision
 (d).

(3) The department may standardize the informational materials for use by the department and Medi-Cal managed care plans, as deemed appropriate by the department to implement this section.

(c) (1) The department shall, in consultation with stakeholders, regularly review the informational materials to ensure that the materials are up to date.

(2) To ensure that the informational materials use clear and nontechnical language that effectively informs Medi-Cal beneficiaries, the department shall test the quality, clarity, and cultural concordance of translations of the informational materials with Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(d) (1) A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall provide to the respective beneficiary who is
 eligible for EPSDT services, or to the parent or other authorized representative of that beneficiary, as applicable, the informational materials described in this section within a maximum number of calendar days, as specified by the department, after that beneficiary’s enrollment in a managed care plan and annually thereafter for beneficiaries who continue to be enrolled with the same Medi-Cal managed care plan. For beneficiaries in fee-for-service Medi-Cal, the department or its representative shall provide to the respective beneficiary who is eligible for EPSDT services, or to the parent or other authorized representative of that beneficiary, as applicable, the informational materials described in this section within 60 calendar days after that beneficiary’s initial Medi-Cal eligibility determination and annually thereafter, for beneficiaries who continue to be enrolled in fee-for-service Medi-Cal.

(2) The department or the Medi-Cal managed
 care plan, as applicable, shall provide the content designed for youth, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), to a beneficiary who is 12 years of age or older but under 21 years of age, in accordance with the schedule described in paragraph (1).

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “EPSDT services” means services covered under subdivision (v) of Section 14132 and that meet the standards set forth in Section 1396d(r) of Title 42 of the United States Code.
